Indiana, session 2026, SB180.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 16-27.5-5-5, AS ADDED BY P.L.143-2025,
SECTION 24, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
SEPTEMBER 1, 2025 (RETROACTIVE)]: Sec. 5. (a) A home health
aide competency evaluation program must:
(1) operate in accordance with 42 CFR 484.80; and
(2) address each topic described in section 4(a) of this chapter.
(b) A home health aide competency evaluation program must
include at least seventy-five (75) hours of training. At least sixteen (16)
hours of classroom training must occur before supervised practical
training.
SECTION 2. IC 16-41-14-17 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 17. (a) This section does not apply to a person who
transfers for research purposes semen that contains antibodies for the
human immunodeficiency virus (HIV).
(b) A person who, for the purpose of artificial insemination,
recklessly, knowingly, or intentionally donates, sells, or transfers semen
that contains antibodies for the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV)
commits transferring contaminated semen, a Level 5 felony. The
offense is a Level 4 felony if the offense results in the transmission of
the virus to another person.
SEA 180 — Concur

2
SECTION 3. IC 25-13-1-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.103-2011,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Any person desiring to practice dental
hygiene in Indiana must procure from the board a license to practice
dental hygiene. To procure a license, the applicant must submit to the
board proof of graduation from an institution for educating dental
hygienists that is approved by the board described in section 6(2) of
this chapter and other credentials required by this chapter, together
with an application on forms prescribed and furnished by the board.
Each applicant must pay to the board an application fee set by the
board under section 5 of this chapter at the time the application is made
and must pass an examination administered by an entity approved by
the board. The board may establish under section 5 of this chapter
additional requirements as a prerequisite to taking an examination for
any applicant who has failed the examination two (2) or more times.
Application fees are not refundable.
(b) An applicant described under subsection (a) shall, at the request
of the board, make an appearance before the board.
SECTION 4. IC 25-13-1-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The board shall
enforce this chapter.
(b) The board may adopt rules consistent with this chapter and with
IC 25-14-1 necessary for the proper enforcement of this chapter, the
examination of dental hygienists, the educational requirements
described in section 6(2) of this chapter, and for the conduct of the
practice of dental hygiene.
(c) The board may utilize a dental hygienist education program's
accreditation by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the
American Dental Association as evidence that the program has met all
or part of the standards for dental hygienist education programs
established by the board.
SECTION 5. IC 25-13-1-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.264-2013,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. An applicant:
(1) must not have been convicted of a crime that has a direct
bearing on the applicant's ability to practice competently;
(2) must be a graduate of a:
(A) school for dental hygienists that:
(A) (i) is accredited by the Commission on Dental
Accreditation of the American Dental Association;
(B) (ii) is recognized by the board; and
(C) (iii) requires a formal course of training of not less than
SEA 180 — Concur

3
two (2) years of eight (8) months each; or
(B) dental college or university in a foreign country with a
degree that is equal to at least a doctorate in Indiana of:
(i) dental surgery; or
(ii) dental medicine;
determined and approved by the board;
(3) must pass an examination administered by an entity approved
by the board; and
(4) may not take the examination described in subdivision (3)
more than three (3) times; and
(5) if the applicant is a graduate of a dental college or
university described in subdivision (2), must submit the
following to the board:
(A) The applicant's academic transcripts for review by the
board, including an English translation of the transcript if
the transcript is not in English.
(B) A satisfactory credential verification assessment by:
(i) the board;
(ii) an organization that is a member of the National
Association of Credential Evaluation Services; or
(iii) any other organization approved by the board.
SECTION 6. IC 25-13-1-10.7, AS ADDED BY P.L.35-2020,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.7. (a) A dental hygienist or dental assistant (as
defined in IC 25-14-1-1.5(4)) may administer nitrous oxide under the
direct supervision of a licensed dentist if the dental hygienist or dental
assistant has:
(1) either:
(A) been employed in a dental practice for at least one (1)
year; or
(B) has graduated from a program:
(i) accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of
the American Dental Association; or
(ii) approved by the board;
(2) satisfactorily completed a three (3) hour didactic nitrous oxide
administration course that:
(A) containing contains curriculum on pharmacology,
biochemistry, anatomy of nitrous oxide administration,
emergency procedures, and the mechanics of operating a
nitrous unit; and
(B) is accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation
of the American Dental Association or approved by the
SEA 180 — Concur

4
board; and
(3) demonstrated clinical competency on at least five (5) patients
under the direct supervision of a licensed Indiana dentist whose
license is in good standing.
(b) The licensed Indiana dentist supervising the clinical competency
under subsection (a)(3) shall provide to the dental hygienist or dental
assistant a signed affidavit certifying the competency.
(c) Upon receipt of the affidavit provided to a dental hygienist or
dental assistant under subsection (b), the provider of an educational
program or curriculum described in subsection (a)(2) shall issue a
certificate of completion to the dental hygienist or dental assistant. The
certificate of completion must be publicly displayed in the dental office
of the dental hygienist or dental assistant.
(d) Before permitting a dental hygienist or dental assistant to
administer nitrous oxide, the supervising dentist shall:
(1) verify that the dental hygienist or dental assistant has
completed the requirements of subsection (a);
(2) determine the maximum percent-dosage of nitrous oxide to be
administered to the patient; and
(3) ensure that any administration or monitoring of nitrous oxide
by dental hygienists or dental assistants is done in accordance
with relevant guidelines and standards developed by the
American Dental Association or the American Academy of
Pediatric Dentistry.
SECTION 7. IC 25-14-1-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.264-2013,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) A person desiring to begin the practice of
dentistry in Indiana shall procure from the board a license to practice
dentistry in Indiana. Except as provided in section 4.5 of this chapter,
to procure the license, the applicant must submit to the board proof of
graduation from a dental college recognized by the board. The board
may recognize dental schools accredited by the Commission on Dental
Accreditation of the American Dental Association, if the board is
satisfied that the recognition is consistent with the board's
requirements. Every applicant must pass an examination administered
by an entity approved by the board and, except as provided in
subsection (b), may not take the examination more than three (3)
times.
(b) The board may establish additional requirements for an
applicant who has failed the examination at least three (3) times.
The applicant must complete any additional requirements before
the applicant may take the examination again.
SEA 180 — Concur

5
(b) (c) A fee paid under this article may not be refunded.
SECTION 8. IC 25-34.5-2-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) Each applicant
for licensure as a respiratory care practitioner must present satisfactory
evidence that the applicant:
(1) does not have a conviction for:
(A) an act that would constitute a ground for disciplinary
sanction under IC 25-1-9; or
(B) a crime that has a direct bearing on the practitioner's
ability to practice competently;
(2) has not been the subject of a disciplinary action initiated by
the licensing or certification agency of another state or
jurisdiction on the grounds that the applicant was unable to
practice as a respiratory care practitioner without endangering the
public; and
(3) has either:
(A) before January 1, 2028, passed a respiratory care
practitioner licensing or certification examination approved by
the board; or
(B) after December 31, 2027, successfully completed both
portions of the registered respiratory therapist
examination, administered by the National Board for
Respiratory Care or its successor organization.
(b) Each applicant for licensure as a respiratory care practitioner
must submit proof to the committee of the applicant's:
(1) graduation from a school or program of respiratory care that
meets standards set by the board;
(2) completion of a United States military training program in
respiratory care; or
(3) completion of sufficient postsecondary education to be
credentialed by a national respiratory care practitioner
organization approved by the committee.
(c) At the time of making application, each applicant must pay a fee
determined by the board after consideration of a recommendation of
the committee.
SECTION 9. IC 25-34.5-2-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.177-2015,
SECTION 75, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) Except as provided in section 11 of this
chapter, the committee shall issue a license to each applicant who
(1) successfully passes the examination provided in section 12 of
this chapter; and
(2) meets the requirements of section 8 of this chapter.
SEA 180 — Concur

6
(b) Subject to IC 25-1-2-6(e), a license issued under this section
expires on the last day of the regular renewal cycle established under
IC 25-1-5-4.
SECTION 10. IC 25-34.5-2-10.1, AS AMENDED BY
P.L.149-2022, SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.1. (a) The
committee shall issue a temporary permit to a person to practice
respiratory care or to profess to be a respiratory care practitioner, not
more than thirty (30) days after the application is filed and completed,
if the person pays a fee and:
(1) has:
(A) a valid license or certificate to practice from another state;
and
(B) applied for a license from the committee;
(2) is practicing in a state that does not license or certify
respiratory care practitioners but is credentialed by a national
respiratory care practitioner association approved by the
committee, and the person has applied for a license from the
committee; or
(3) has:
(A) been approved by the committee to take the next
examination; and
(B) graduated from a school or program approved by the
committee. is qualified to take the examination by being a
graduate of a school or program of respiratory care that
meets standards set by the board.
(b) A temporary permit expires the earlier of:
(1) the date the person holding the permit is issued a license under
this article; or
(2) the date the committee disapproves the person's license
application.
(c) The committee may renew a temporary permit if the person
holding the permit was scheduled to take the next examination and:
(1) did not take the examination; and
(2) shows good cause for not taking the examination.
(d) A permit renewed under subsection (c) expires on the date the
person holding the permit receives the results from the next
examination given after the permit was issued.
SECTION 11. IC 25-34.5-2-12 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 12. (a) Examinations of applicants for licensure under
this article shall be held at least semiannually on dates set by the board.
(b) An examination under this section must include a written
SEA 180 — Concur

7
examination that tests the following:
(1) The applicant's knowledge of the basic and clinical sciences
as they relate to the practice of respiratory care.
(2) Other subjects that the committee considers useful to test an
applicant's fitness to practice respiratory care.
(c) An otherwise qualified applicant who fails an examination and
is refused licensure may take another scheduled examination upon
payment of an additional fee set by the board under rules adopted under
section 7 of this chapter.
SECTION 12. IC 25-34.5-2-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.152-2024,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) The committee shall issue a student permit
to an individual if the individual does the following:
(1) Submits the appropriate application to the committee.
(2) Pays the fee established by the board.
(3) Submits written proof to the committee that the individual is
a student in good standing in a respiratory care school or program
that: has been:
(A) has been approved by the committee for purposes of
section 8(b)(1) of this chapter;
(B) approved by the committee for purposes of section
10.1(a)(3)(B) is described in section 10.1(a)(3) of this
chapter; or
(C) has been otherwise approved by the committee.
(4) Submits satisfactory evidence that the individual:
(A) does not have a conviction described in section 8(a)(1) of
this chapter; and
(B) has not been the subject of a disciplinary action described
in section 8(a)(2) of this chapter.
(b) The committee shall issue a student permit as soon as it is
reasonably practicable after an individual fulfills the requirements of
subsection (a).
(c) An individual who holds a student permit may only perform
respiratory care procedures that have been part of a course:
(1) the individual has successfully completed in the respiratory
care program designated under subsection (a)(3); and
(2) for which the successful completion has been documented and
that is available upon request to the committee.
(d) The committee may expand the list of respiratory care
procedures that an individual may perform under the individual's
student permit to include additional respiratory care procedures that
have been part of a course:
SEA 180 — Concur

8
(1) that the individual has successfully completed in the
respiratory care program designated under subsection (a)(3); and
(2) for which the individual's successful completion has been
documented.
Upon request by the committee, the individual shall provide
documentation of the successful completion of a course described in
this subsection.
(e) The procedures permitted under subsections (c) and (d) may be
performed only:
(1) on patients who are not critical care patients; and
(2) under the proximate supervision of a practitioner.
(f) A holder of a student permit shall meet in person at least one (1)
time each working day with the permit holder's supervising practitioner
or a designated respiratory care practitioner to review the permit
holder's clinical activities. The supervising practitioner or a designated
respiratory care practitioner shall review and countersign the entries
that the permit holder makes in a patient's medical record not more
than seven (7) calendar days after the permit holder makes the entries.
(g) A supervising practitioner may not supervise at one (1) time
more than three (3) holders of student permits issued under this section.
(h) A student permit expires on the earliest of the following:
(1) The date the permit holder is issued a license under this
article.
(2) The date the committee disapproves the permit holder's
application for a license under this article.
(3) The date the permit holder ceases to be a student in good
standing in a respiratory care program approved by the
committee. The graduation of a student permit holder from a
respiratory care program approved by the committee does not
cause the student permit to expire under this subdivision.
(4) Sixty (60) days after the date that the permit holder graduates
from a respiratory care program approved by the committee.
(5) The date that the permit holder is notified that the permit
holder has failed the licensure examination.
(6) Two (2) years after the date of issuance.
SECTION 13. IC 35-52-16-58 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 58. IC 16-41-14-17 defines a crime concerning
communicable diseases.
SECTION 14. IC 36-8-4-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.66-2020,
SECTION 1, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The following definitions apply
throughout this section:
SEA 180 — Concur

9
(1) "Firefighter" means a current or former firefighter.
(2) "Police officer" means a current or former police officer.
(a) (b) A city shall pay for the care of a police officer or firefighter
who suffers an injury while performing the person's duty or while the
person is on duty or who contracts illness caused by the performance
of the person's duty, including an injury or illness that results in a
disability or death presumed incurred in the line of duty under
IC 5-10-13. This care includes:
(1) medical and surgical care;
(2) medicines and laboratory, curative, and palliative agents and
means;
(3) X-ray, diagnostic, and therapeutic service, including during
the recovery period; and
(4) hospital and special nursing care if the physician or surgeon
in charge considers it necessary for proper recovery.
(b) (c) Expenditures required by subsection (a) (b) shall be paid
from the general fund of the city.
(c) (d) A city that has paid for the care of a police officer or
firefighter under subsection (a) (b) has a cause of action for
reimbursement of the amount paid under subsection (a) (b) against any
third party against whom the police officer or firefighter has a cause of
action for an injury sustained because of or an illness caused by the
third party. The city's cause of action under this subsection is in
addition to, and not in lieu of, the cause of action of the police officer
or firefighter against the third party.
(e) The medical benefits under this section are independent and
distinct from any medical benefits that are available under IC 22-3.
A police officer or firefighter may recover medical benefits under
this section without first pursuing a claim for medical benefits
under IC 22-3. If a police officer or firefighter pursues a claim for
medical benefits under IC 22-3 and the claim is withdrawn or
denied, the police officer or firefighter is not precluded from
recovering medical benefits under this section.
SECTION 15. IC 36-8-4.3-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. (a) The following
definitions apply throughout this section:
(1) "Firefighter" means a current or former full-time, paid
firefighter.
(2) "Police officer" means a current or former full-time, paid
police officer.
(a) (b) A special service district shall pay for the care of:
(1) a full-time, paid police officer who:
SEA 180 — Concur

10
(A) suffers an injury; or
(B) contracts an illness;
during the performance of the police officer's duty; or
(2) a full-time, paid firefighter who:
(A) suffers an injury; or
(B) contracts an illness;
during the performance of the firefighter's duty.
(b) (c) The special service district shall pay for the following
expenses incurred by a police officer or firefighter described in
subsection (a): (b):
(1) Medical and surgical care.
(2) Medicines and laboratory, curative, and palliative agents and
means.
(3) X-ray, diagnostic, and therapeutic service, including during
the recovery period.
(4) Hospital and special nursing care if the physician or surgeon
in charge considers it necessary for proper recovery.
(c) (d) Expenditures required by subsection (a) (b) or (c) shall be
paid from the general fund of the special service district.
(d) (e) A special service district that has paid for the care of a police
officer or firefighter under subsection (a) (b) or (c) has a cause of
action for reimbursement of the amount paid under subsection (a) (b)
or (c) against any third party against whom the police officer or
firefighter has a cause of action for an injury sustained because of, or
an illness caused by, the third party. The special service district's cause
of action under this subsection is in addition to, and not in lieu of, the
cause of action of the police officer or firefighter against the third
party.
(f) The medical benefits under this section are independent and
distinct from any medical benefits that are available under IC 22-3.
A police officer or firefighter may recover medical benefits under
this section without first pursuing a claim for medical benefits
under IC 22-3. If the police officer or firefighter pursues a claim
for medical benefits under IC 22-3 and the claim is withdrawn or
denied, the police officer or firefighter is not precluded from
recovering medical benefits under this section.
SECTION 16. IC 36-8-4.5-10 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10. (a) A town shall pay for the
care of a current or retired full-time paid member of a town fire
department who suffers an injury while performing the person's
duty or while the person is on duty or who contracts illness caused
SEA 180 — Concur

11
by the performance of the person's duty, including an injury or
illness that results in a disability or death presumed incurred in the
line of duty under IC 5-10-13. This care includes:
(1) medical and surgical care;
(2) medicines and laboratory, curative, and palliative agents
and means;
(3) x-ray, diagnostic, and therapeutic service, including during
the recovery period; and
(4) hospital and special nursing care if the physician or
surgeon in charge considers it necessary for proper recovery.
(b) Expenditures required by subsection (a) shall be paid from
the general fund of the town.
(c) A town that has paid for the care of a member of a town fire
department under subsection (a) has a cause of action for
reimbursement of the amount paid under subsection (a) against
any third party against whom the member of the town fire
department has a cause of action for an injury sustained because
of or an illness caused by the third party. The town's cause of
action under this subsection is in addition to, and not in lieu of, the
cause of action of the member of the town fire department against
the third party.
(d) The medical benefits under this section are independent and
distinct from any medical benefits that are available under IC 22-3.
A current or retired full-time paid member of a town fire
department may recover benefits under this section without first
pursuing a claim for medical benefits under IC 22-3. If a current
or retired full-time paid member of a town fire department
pursues a claim for medical benefits under IC 22-3 and the claim
is withdrawn or denied, the current or retired full-time paid
member of the town fire department is not precluded from
recovering medical benefits under this section.
SECTION 17. IC 36-8-9-8 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) As used in this
section, "police officer" means a current or former full-time, paid
police officer.
(a) (b) A town shall pay for the care of a full-time, paid police
officer who:
(1) suffers an injury; or
(2) contracts an illness;
during the performance of the police officer's duty.
(b) (c) The town shall pay for the following expenses incurred by a
police officer described in subsection (a): (b):
SEA 180 — Concur

12
(1) Medical and surgical care.
(2) Medicines and laboratory, curative, and palliative agents and
means.
(3) X-ray, diagnostic, and therapeutic service, including during
the recovery period.
(4) Hospital and special nursing care if the physician or surgeon
in charge considers it necessary for proper recovery.
(c) (d) Expenditures required by subsection (a) (b) or (c) shall be
paid from the general fund of the town.
(d) (e) A town that has paid for the care of a police officer under
subsection (a) (b) or (c) has a cause of action for reimbursement of the
amount paid under subsection (a) (b) or (c) against any third party
against whom the police officer has a cause of action for an injury
sustained because of, or an illness caused by, the third party. The
town's cause of action under this subsection is in addition to, and not
in lieu of, the cause of action of the police officer against the third
party.
(f) The medical benefits under this section are independent and
distinct from any medical benefits that are available under IC 22-3.
A police officer may recover medical benefits under this section
without first pursuing a claim for medical benefits under IC 22-3.
If the police officer pursues a claim for medical benefits under
IC 22-3 and the claim is withdrawn or denied, the police officer is
not precluded from recovering medical benefits under this section.
SECTION 18. IC 36-8-11-27 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 27. (a) As used in this
section, "firefighter" means a current or former full-time, paid
firefighter.
(a) (b) A fire protection district shall pay for the care of a full-time,
paid firefighter who: suffers:
(1) suffers an injury; or
(2) contracts an illness;
during the performance of the firefighter's duties.
(b) (c) The fire protection district shall pay for the following
expenses incurred by a firefighter described in subsection (a): (b):
(1) Medical and surgical care.
(2) Medicines and laboratory, curative, and palliative agents and
means.
(3) X-ray, diagnostic, and therapeutic service, including service
provided during the recovery period.
(4) Hospital and special nursing care if the physician or surgeon
in charge considers it necessary for proper recovery.
SEA 180 — Concur

13
(c) (d) Expenditures required by subsection (a) (b) or (c) shall be
paid from the fund used by the fire protection district for payment of
the costs attributable to providing fire protection services in the fire
protection district.
(d) (e) A fire protection district that has paid for the care of a
firefighter under subsection (a) (b) or (c) has a cause of action for
reimbursement of the amount paid under subsection (a) (b) or (c)
against any third party against whom the firefighter has a cause of
action for:
(1) an injury sustained because of; or
(2) an illness caused by;
the third party. The fire protection district's cause of action under this
subsection is in addition to, and not instead of, the cause of action of
the firefighter against the third party.
(f) The medical benefits under this section are independent and
distinct from any medical benefits that are available under IC 22-3.
A firefighter may recover medical benefits under this section
without first pursuing a claim for medical benefits under IC 22-3.
If the firefighter pursues a claim for medical benefits under
IC 22-3 and the claim is withdrawn or denied, the firefighter is not
precluded from recovering medical benefits under this section.
SECTION 19. IC 36-8-13-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.236-2023,
SECTION 207, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) As used in this section,
"firefighter" means a current or former full-time, paid firefighter.
(a) (b) A township shall pay for the care of a full-time, paid
firefighter who: suffers:
(1) suffers an injury; or
(2) contracts an illness;
during the performance of the firefighter's duty.
(b) (c) The township shall pay for the following expenses incurred
by a firefighter described in subsection (a): (b):
(1) Medical and surgical care.
(2) Medicines and laboratory, curative, and palliative agents and
means.
(3) X-ray, diagnostic, and therapeutic service, including during
the recovery period.
(4) Hospital and special nursing care if the physician or surgeon
in charge considers it necessary for proper recovery.
(c) (d) Expenditures required by subsection (a) (b) or (c) shall be
paid from the township firefighting and emergency services fund
established by section 4(a)(1) of this chapter or the township
SEA 180 — Concur

14
firefighting fund established in by section 4(a)(2)(A) of this chapter, as
applicable.
(d) (e) A township that has paid for the care of a firefighter under
subsection (a) (b) or (c) has a cause of action for reimbursement of the
amount paid under subsection (a) (b) or (c) against any third party
against whom the firefighter has a cause of action for an injury
sustained because of, or an illness caused by, the third party. The
township's cause of action under this subsection is in addition to, and
not in lieu of, the cause of action of the firefighter against the third
party.
(f) The medical benefits under this section are independent and
distinct from any medical benefits that are available under IC 22-3.
A firefighter may recover medical benefits under this section
without first pursuing a claim for medical benefits under IC 22-3.
If the firefighter pursues a claim for medical benefits under
IC 22-3 and the claim is withdrawn or denied, the firefighter is not
precluded from recovering medical benefits under this section.
SECTION 20. IC 36-8-19-14 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) As used in this
section, "firefighter" means a current or former full-time, paid
firefighter.
(a) (b) A provider unit shall pay for the care of a full-time, paid
firefighter who:
(1) suffers an injury; or
(2) contracts an illness;
during the performance of the firefighter's duty.
(b) (c) The provider unit shall pay for the following expenses
incurred by a firefighter described in subsection (a): (b):
(1) Medical and surgical care.
(2) Medicines and laboratory, curative, and palliative agents and
means.
(3) X-ray, diagnostic, and therapeutic service, including during
the recovery period.
(4) Hospital and special nursing care if the physician or surgeon
in charge considers it necessary for proper recovery.
(c) (d) Expenditures required by subsection (a) (b) or (c) shall be
paid from the fund used by the provider unit for payment of the costs
attributable to providing fire protection services in the provider unit.
(d) (e) A provider unit that has paid for the care of a firefighter
under subsection (a) (b) or (c) has a cause of action for reimbursement
of the amount paid under subsection (a) (b) or (c) against any third
party against whom the firefighter has a cause of action for an injury
SEA 180 — Concur

15
sustained because of, or an illness caused by, the third party. The
provider unit's cause of action under this subsection is in addition to,
and not in lieu of, the cause of action of the firefighter against the third
party.
(f) The medical benefits under this section are independent and
distinct from any medical benefits that are available under IC 22-3.
A firefighter may recover medical benefits under this section
without first pursuing a claim for medical benefits under IC 22-3.
If the firefighter pursues a claim for medical benefits under
IC 22-3 and the claim is withdrawn or denied, the firefighter is not
precluded from recovering medical benefits under this section.
SECTION 21. [EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE] (a) The legislative
council is urged to assign to an appropriate study committee the
task of studying fraud in the health care system, including
Medicaid and other local or state health programs.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2028.
SECTION 22. An emergency is declared for this act.
SEA 180 — Concur

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 180 — Concur